Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1214
Applicability of insurance laws.

Reciprocal or interinsurance contracts, the exchange thereof, the subscribers, attorneys in fact, agents, and representatives, and all matters incident to or concerned with such contracts and relationship, shall be exclusively subject to and regulated by the provisions of sections 44-1201 to 44-1214, and no other law relating to insurance heretofore or hereafter enacted, except as provided in this article, or when such other law relating to insurance specifically uses the words reciprocal or interinsurance.

Laws 1917, c. 189, § 13, p. 462;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. XV, § 13, p. 686;

C.S.1922, § 7981;

C.S.1929, § 44-1513;

R.S.1943, § 44-1214;

Laws 1949, c. 154, § 1(1), p. 393.

Fraternal benefit insurance organizations are not exempt from law confining all corporations, societies and associations to objects and purposes of existence. Folts v. Globe Life Ins. Co., 117 Neb. 723, 223 N.W. 797 (1929).